New York, session 2025-2026, S2058.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 355 of the education law is amended by adding a new 2 subdivision 22 to read as follows: 3 22. The state university trustees shall adopt a policy for the 4 provision of emergency contraception available for purchase through at 5 least one vending machine, existing or new, located on each state-oper- 6 ated institution in the state university offering in-person student 7 instruction. The vending machine shall be located in a secure and 8 accessible area of campus. The location of the vending machine shall be 9 included on the institution's website. 10 (a) Emergency contraception made available through each vending 11 machine shall satisfy, at a minimum, all of the following requirements: 12 (i) The emergency contraception shall be sold only in the manufactur- 13 er's clearly labeled, original, unbroken, tamper-proof, and expiration- 14 dated packaging. 15 (ii) The emergency contraception may not be older than the manufactur- 16 er's expiration date. 17 (iii) The emergency contraception shall be stored in accordance with 18 manufacturer recommendations. 19 (b) For the purposes of this subdivision, the term "emergency contra- 20 ception" means over-the-counter medication to be self-administered that EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01857-01-5 S. 2058 2 1 is approved by the federal Food and Drug Administration that can signif- 2 icantly reduce the risk of pregnancy if taken within seventy-two hours 3 after unprotected sexual intercourse. 4 § 2. Section 6206 of the education law is amended by adding a new 5 subdivision 24 to read as follows: 6 24. The board of trustees shall adopt a policy requiring the provision 7 of emergency contraception available for purchase through at least one 8 vending machine, existing or new, located on each institution of the 9 city university of New York offering in-person student instruction. The 10 vending machine shall be located in a secure and accessible area of 11 campus. The location of the vending machine shall be included on the 12 institution's website. 13 (a) Emergency contraception made available through each vending 14 machine shall satisfy, at a minimum, all of the following requirements: 15 (i) The emergency contraception shall be sold only in the manufactur- 16 er's clearly labeled, original, unbroken, tamper-proof, and expiration- 17 dated packaging. 18 (ii) The emergency contraception may not be older than the manufactur- 19 er's expiration date. 20 (iii) The emergency contraception shall be stored in accordance with 21 manufacturer recommendations. 22 (b) For the purposes of this subdivision, the term "emergency contra- 23 ception" means over-the-counter medication to be self-administered that 24 is approved by the federal Food and Drug Administration that can signif- 25 icantly reduce the risk of pregnancy if taken within seventy-two hours 26 after unprotected sexual intercourse. 27 § 3. This act shall take effect April 1, 2026. The boards of trustees 28 for the state university of New York and the city university of New York 29 shall adopt policies to implement the provisions of this act within 60 30 days after this act shall have become a law.